Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 17 Physically Handicapped — Architectural Standards — Public Financed Buildings [Repealed.]

37-17-1 — 37-17-19.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §§

37-17-1

—

37-17-1

9; P.L. 1969, ch. 222, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 235, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1981, ch. 236, § 6. For powers of the state building standards committee, see §

23-27.3-100.1.5

.